Utah statutes.
53B-3-107.   Traffic violations -- Notice of rule or regulation.

(1)  It is a violation of this section for any person to operate or park a vehicle upon any property owned or controlled by a state institution of higher education contrary to posted signs authorized by the published rules and regulations of the institution or to block or impede traffic through or on any of these properties.

(2)  Notice of a rule or regulation to all persons is sufficient if the rule or regulation is published in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the institution and the campus or facility is located.

